Illinois, session 104th, SB3216.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 248 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/248 new)7    Sec. 248. Early Childhood Educator Tax Credit.8    (a) As used in this Act: 9    "Consumer Price Index-U" means the index published by the 10Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 11Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 12services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 13average, all items, 1982-84=100. 14    "Early childhood assistant" means a person who is employed 15by and working in a child care center as an early childhood 16assistant and who meets the qualifications to be an early 17childhood assistant set forth in 89 Ill. Adm. Code 407.150. 18    "Early childhood educator credit amount" means: 19        (1) for taxable years beginning on January 1, 2026 and 20    beginning before January 1, 2027, $1,000; and 21        (2) for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 22    2026, the early childhood educator credit amount for the 23    immediately preceding calendar year, multiplied by one   SB3216- 2 -LRB104 19260 HLH 32706 b1    plus the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer 2    Price Index-u for the 12-month period ending in September 3    of the calendar year immediately preceding the first day 4    of the taxable year for which the early childhood educator 5    credit amount is calculated. 6    "Early childhood teacher" means a person who is employed 7by and working in a child care center as a teacher and who 8meets the qualifications to be an early childhood teacher set 9forth in 89 Ill. Adm. Code 407.140. 10    (b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 112026, a taxpayer who is employed as an early childhood teacher 12or an early childhood assistant during the taxable year and 13who has a federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year of 14$75,000 or less shall be allowed a credit against the tax 15imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount 16equal to the early childhood educator credit amount. 17    (c) If the amount of the credit exceeds the taxpayer's 18Illinois income tax liability for the taxable year, then the 19excess amount of the credit shall be refunded to the taxpayer. 20    (d) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 21250. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.